Washington statutes.
RCW 44.28.010

Committee created—Members.

The joint legislative audit and review committee is created, which shall consist of eight senators and eight representatives from the legislature. The senate members of the joint committee shall be appointed by the president of the senate, and the house members of the joint committee shall be appointed by the speaker of the house. Not more than four members from each house shall be from the same political party. Members shall be appointed before the close of each regular session of the legislature during an odd-numbered year.

[ 2010 c 26 s 1; 1996 c 288 s 3; 1983 c 52 s 1; 1980 c 87 s 30; 1969 c 10 s 4; 1967 ex.s. c 114 s 1; 1963 ex.s. c 20 s 1; 1955 c 206 s 4; 1951 c 43 s 1.]